District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0804.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Law Enforcement Cadet Pathways Expansion Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 2 of the Police Officer and Firefighter Cadet Programs Funding
Authorization and Human Rights Act of 1977 Amendment Act of 1982, effective March 9, 1983
(D.C. Law 4-172; D.C. Official Code § 5-109.01), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) The police officer cadet program established in paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall be composed of the following persons residing in the District, who shall have
substantial ties to the District, such as currently or formerly residing, attending school, or
working in the District for a significant period of time:
“(A) Senior-year high school students;


“(B) High school graduates under 25 years of age; and
“(C) Graduates of District of Columbia high schools ages 25 years of age
to 40 years of age.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) A person successfully completing the required training and service in a cadet
program established pursuant to this section shall be accorded full preference for appointment as
a member of MPD or of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department, if the person
shall have met all other requirements pertaining to membership in the chosen Department, and
must serve at least five years consecutively as a member of MPD or of the Fire and Emergency
Medical Services Department.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).